Illinois, session 104th, HB3836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-170 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-170)7    Sec. 15-170. Senior citizens homestead exemption. 8    (a) An annual homestead exemption limited, except as 9described here with relation to cooperatives or life care 10facilities, to a maximum reduction set forth below from the 11property's value, as equalized or assessed by the Department, 12is granted for property that is occupied as a residence by a 13person 65 years of age or older who is liable for paying real 14estate taxes on the property and is an owner of record of the 15property or has a legal or equitable interest therein as 16evidenced by a written instrument, except for a leasehold 17interest, other than a leasehold interest of land on which a 18single family residence is located, which is occupied as a 19residence by a person 65 years or older who has an ownership 20interest therein, legal, equitable or as a lessee, and on 21which he or she is liable for the payment of property taxes. 22Before taxable year 2004, the maximum reduction shall be 23$2,500 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and   HB3836- 2 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1$2,000 in all other counties. For taxable years 2004 through 22005, the maximum reduction shall be $3,000 in all counties. 3For taxable years 2006 and 2007, the maximum reduction shall 4be $3,500. For taxable years 2008 through 2011, the maximum 5reduction is $4,000 in all counties. For taxable year 2012, 6the maximum reduction is $5,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or 7more inhabitants and $4,000 in all other counties. For taxable 8years 2013 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $5,000 in 9all counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $8,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $5,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 and thereafter, the maximum reduction is $8,000 in 13counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and counties that 14are contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants 15and $5,000 in all other counties. 16    (b) For land improved with an apartment building owned and 17operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 18value of the property, as equalized by the Department, shall 19be multiplied by the number of apartments or units occupied by 20a person 65 years of age or older who is liable, by contract 21with the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes 22on the property and is an owner of record of a legal or 23equitable interest in the cooperative apartment building, 24other than a leasehold interest. For land improved with a life 25care facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 26property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied   HB3836- 3 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1by the number of apartments or units occupied by persons 65 2years of age or older, irrespective of any legal, equitable, 3or leasehold interest in the facility, who are liable, under a 4contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 5for paying property taxes on the property. In a cooperative or 6a life care facility where a homestead exemption has been 7granted, the cooperative association or the management firm of 8the cooperative or facility shall credit the savings resulting 9from that exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of 10the owner or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any 11person who willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be 12guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. Under this Section and 13Sections 15-175, 15-176, and 15-177, "life care facility" 14means a facility, as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 15Facilities Act, with which the applicant for the homestead 16exemption has a life care contract as defined in that Act.17    (c) When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 18Section and the person qualifying subsequently becomes a 19resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 20Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 21Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 22Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall continue so 23long as the residence continues to be occupied by the 24qualifying person's spouse if the spouse is 65 years of age or 25older, or if the residence remains unoccupied but is still 26owned by the person qualified for the homestead exemption.  HB3836- 4 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1    (d) A person who will be 65 years of age during the current 2assessment year shall be eligible to apply for the homestead 3exemption during that assessment year. A person may apply for 4the homestead exemption under this Section if the person is 64 5years of age or older, as long as the person will be 65 years 6of age during the assessment year for which the exemption is 7sought. Application shall be made during the application 8period in effect for the county of his residence.9    (e) Beginning with assessment year 2003, for taxes payable 10in 2004, property that is first occupied as a residence after 11January 1 of any assessment year by a person who is eligible 12for the senior citizens homestead exemption under this Section 13must be granted a pro-rata exemption for the assessment year. 14The amount of the pro-rata exemption is the exemption allowed 15in the county under this Section divided by 365 and multiplied 16by the number of days during the assessment year the property 17is occupied as a residence by a person eligible for the 18exemption under this Section. The chief county assessment 19officer must adopt reasonable procedures to establish 20eligibility for this pro-rata exemption.21    (f) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 22determine the eligibility of a life care facility to receive 23the benefits provided by this Section, by affidavit, 24application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 25reasonable methods in order to ensure that the tax savings 26resulting from the exemption are credited by the management   HB3836- 5 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1firm to the apportioned tax liability of each qualifying 2resident. The assessor may request reasonable proof that the 3management firm has so credited the exemption.4    (g) The chief county assessment officer of each county 5with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants shall provide to each 6person allowed a homestead exemption under this Section a form 7to designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 8notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 9levied under this Code on the property of the person receiving 10the exemption. The duplicate notice shall be in addition to 11the notice required to be provided to the person receiving the 12exemption, and shall be given in the manner required by this 13Code. The person filing the request for the duplicate notice 14shall pay a fee of $5 to cover administrative costs to the 15supervisor of assessments, who shall then file the executed 16designation with the county collector. Notwithstanding any 17other provision of this Code to the contrary, the filing of 18such an executed designation requires the county collector to 19provide duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 20designation may be rescinded by the person who executed such 21designation at any time, in the manner and form required by the 22chief county assessment officer.23    (h) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 24determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 25the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 26application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other   HB3836- 6 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1reasonable methods. The determination shall be made in 2accordance with guidelines established by the Department.3    (i) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 4taxable years 2010 through 2018, each taxpayer who has been 5granted an exemption under this Section must reapply on an 6annual basis. 7    If a reapplication is required, then the chief county 8assessment officer shall mail the application to the taxpayer 9at least 60 days prior to the last day of the application 10period for the county. 11    For taxable years 2019 and thereafter, in counties with 123,000,000 or more inhabitants, a taxpayer who has been granted 13an exemption under this Section need not reapply. However, if 14the property ceases to be qualified for the exemption under 15this Section in any year for which a reapplication is not 16required under this Section, then the owner of record of the 17property shall notify the chief county assessment officer that 18the property is no longer qualified. In addition, for taxable 19years 2019 and thereafter, the chief county assessment officer 20of a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants shall enter 21into an intergovernmental agreement with the county clerk of 22that county and the Department of Public Health, as well as any 23other appropriate governmental agency, to obtain information 24that documents the death of a taxpayer who has been granted an 25exemption under this Section. Notwithstanding any other 26provision of law, the county clerk and the Department of   HB3836- 7 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1Public Health shall provide that information to the chief 2county assessment officer. The Department of Public Health 3shall supply this information no less frequently than every 4calendar quarter. Information concerning the death of a 5taxpayer may be shared with the county treasurer. The chief 6county assessment officer shall also enter into a data 7exchange agreement with the Social Security Administration or 8its agent to obtain access to the information regarding deaths 9in possession of the Social Security Administration. The chief 10county assessment officer shall, subject to the notice 11requirements under subsection (m) of Section 9-275, terminate 12the exemption under this Section if the information obtained 13indicates that the property is no longer qualified for the 14exemption. In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 15assessor and the county clerk shall establish policies and 16practices for the regular exchange of information for the 17purpose of alerting the assessor whenever the transfer of 18ownership of any property receiving an exemption under this 19Section has occurred. When such a transfer occurs, the 20assessor shall mail a notice to the new owner of the property 21(i) informing the new owner that the exemption will remain in 22place through the year of the transfer, after which it will be 23canceled, and (ii) providing information pertaining to the 24rules for reapplying for the exemption if the owner qualifies. 25In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the chief 26county assessment official shall conduct, by no later than   HB3836- 8 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1December 31 of the first year of each reassessment cycle, as 2determined by Section 9-220, a review of all exemptions 3granted under this Section for the preceding reassessment 4cycle under this Section. The review shall be designed to 5ascertain whether any senior homestead exemptions have been 6granted erroneously. If it is determined that a senior 7homestead exemption has been erroneously applied to a 8property, the chief county assessment officer shall make use 9of the appropriate provisions of Section 9-275 in relation to 10the property that received the erroneous homestead exemption. 11    (j) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 12county board may by resolution provide that if a person has 13been granted a homestead exemption under this Section, the 14person qualifying need not reapply for the exemption. In 15counties in which the county board passes such a resolution, 16the chief county assessment official shall, prior to the 17submission of the final abstract for the first year of each 18reassessment cycle, as determined by Section 9-215, review all 19exemptions granted for the preceding reassessment cycle under 20this Section. The review shall be designed to ascertain 21whether any senior homestead exemptions have been granted 22erroneously. 23    In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if the 24assessor or chief county assessment officer requires annual 25application for verification of eligibility for an exemption 26once granted under this Section, the application shall be   HB3836- 9 -LRB104 11450 HLH 21538 b1mailed to the taxpayer.2    (l) The assessor or chief county assessment officer shall 3notify each person who qualifies for an exemption under this 4Section that the person may also qualify for deferral of real 5estate taxes under the Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax 6Deferral Act. The notice shall set forth the qualifications 7needed for deferral of real estate taxes, the address and 8telephone number of county collector, and a statement that 9applications for deferral of real estate taxes may be obtained 10from the county collector.11    (m) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 12Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 13implementation of any mandate created by this Section.14(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.